District of Columbia statutes.
48-833.02

Manner of reporting.

By July 1st of each year, a manufacturer or labeler of prescription drugs that directly or indirectly distributes prescription drugs for dispensation to residents of the District shall file a report with the Department in the form and manner provided by the Department. The report shall be accompanied by payment of a fee, as set by the Department in rule, to support the work of the Department under this subchapter.

May 18, 2004, D.C. Law 15-164, § 302, 51 DCR 3688
This section is referenced in § 48-833.03.